Utah statutes.
17-50-323.   Indemnification of farmers markets.
A county may:
(1)  operate a farmers market, as defined in Section 4-5-2, on county-owned
property in order to promote economic development;
(2)  indemnify a food producer participating in the farmers market; and
(3)  define the scope of the indemnification in an agreement with the food
producer.
